Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1417
Funds; deposit; disbursement; books and records.

All funds collected by the dock board, or appropriated by the county or municipality for dock purposes from the proceeds of bonds or otherwise, shall be deposited with the treasurer of the county or municipality, as the case may be, and disbursed by him only upon warrants or orders duly executed as provided by law for the execution of warrants or orders of such county or municipality and which shall state distinctly the purpose for which the same are drawn; and a permanent record shall be kept by the board of all warrants or orders so drawn, showing the date, amount, consideration, and to whom payable. When paid, the same shall be canceled and kept on file by the treasurer of the county or municipality, as the case may be. The books of the board shall from time to time be audited upon the order of the county board or governing body of the municipality, as the case may be, in such manner as it may direct, and all such books and records of the board shall at all times be open to public inspection.

Laws 1937, c. 37, § 3, p. 173;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-2003;

R.S.1943, § 18-716;

Laws 1967, c. 84, § 14, p. 267;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-716.